California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
All records and files of the office relating to any complaint or investigation made pursuant to this chapter and the identities of complainants, witnesses, patients, or residents shall remain confidential, unless disclosure is authorized by the patient or resident or his or her conservator of the person or legal representative, required by court order, or release of the information is to a law enforcement agency, public protective service agency, licensing or certification agency in a manner consistent with federal laws and regulations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9726.

(a) The office shall establish a toll-free telephone hotline to receive telephone calls concerning any crises discovered by any person in a long-term care facility, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 9701. The telephone hotline established under this section shall be operated to include at least all of the following:

(1) The telephone hotline shall be available 24 hours a day, seven days a week.

(2) The operator shall respond to a crisis call by contacting the appropriate office, agency, or individual in the local community in which the crisis occurred.

(3) The toll-free telephone hotline number shall be posted conspicuously in either the facility foyer, lobby, residents’ activity room, or other conspicuous location easily accessible to residents in each licensed facility by the licensee. The office shall issue, in conjunction with the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Public Health, guidelines concerning the posting of the toll-free telephone hotline number. The posting shall, at a minimum, include the purpose of the toll-free telephone hotline number.

(b) The office shall respond to telephone hotline calls.

(c) The toll-free telephone hotline shall be staffed in a manner consistent with available resources in the office. The office may contract
 for the services of organizations to staff the telephone hotline. The office shall seek to provide opportunities for older individuals to be employed to staff the hotline. The State Department of Public Health and the State Department of Social Services, and other appropriate departments, shall make available to the department and the office training and technical assistance as needed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 649, Sec. 17.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9726.1.

(a) The office and approved organizations may do any of the following:

(1) Advise the public of any inspection report, statements of deficiency, and plans of correction, for any long-term care facilities within its service area.

(2) Promote visitation programs to long-term care facilities within its service area.

(3) Establish and assist in the development of resident, family, and friends’ councils.

(4) Sponsor other community involvement in long-term care facilities.

(5) Present community education and training programs to long-term care facilities, human service workers, families, and the general public, about long-term care and residents’ rights issues.

(b) Those programs created under this section that are held in a facility shall be developed in consultation with the facility. If the facility and the ombudsman cannot agree on these programs, the State Ombudsman may assist in resolving the dispute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 649, Sec. 18.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Enforcement [9730. - 9732.]

9730.

Anyone who willfully interferes with any lawful action of the office shall be immediately referred to the appropriate licensing authority, which shall respond within the legally prescribed time period.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9731.

Notwithstanding the availability of statutory damages, this chapter shall not be construed to limit the ability of a court to issue equitable relief where the legal remedies provided would not be an adequate method of preventing or curing the particular injury in question.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9732.

(a) Any person who willfully interferes with any lawful action of the office shall be subject to a civil penalty of no more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each incident. The civil penalty shall be assessed by the director. If the penalty is not paid within 30 days of the assessment, the director shall initiate an action to collect the penalties in the jurisdiction in which the facility is located.

(b) Each instance of willful interference may be reported to local law enforcement and the appropriate licensing agency as an act of isolation, as defined in Section 15610.43.

(c) All civil penalties collected by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Access to Facilities Account, which is hereby created within the Special Deposit Fund under Section 16370 of the Government Code. Funds in this account shall be available, upon appropriation, to the office to fund the training costs, and to reimburse the travel expenses, of local ombudsman programs throughout the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 521, Sec. 3.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Advisory Council [9740. - 9741.]

9740.

(a) The department shall establish an 11-member advisory council for the office. Members of the council shall be appointed by the director, and shall consist of representatives of community organizations, area agencies on aging, two long-term care providers, federal Older Americans Act funded direct services providers, the commission, the California Long-Term Care Ombudsman Association, county government, and other appropriate governmental agencies. The director shall make the appointments from lists of no less than five names submitted by each of the designated entities.

(b) The advisory council shall provide advice and consultation to the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program and the director on issues affecting the provision of ombudsman services, including the review of proposed policy changes to the operation of the program, and may make recommendations, within 30 days, as appropriate. The advisory council shall meet at least three times annually. Representatives on the advisory council shall receive their actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred in participation on the advisory council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 943, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

9741.

At least 30 days prior to the designation of a new organization or agency as an approved organization, the department shall notify the advisory council for the purpose of soliciting comments regarding the designation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Regulations [9745. - 9745.]

9745.

The department shall adopt regulations to implement this chapter in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The initial adoption of any emergency regulations after January 1, 1999, shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. Emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 943, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12. Regulations [9750. - 9750.]

9750.

The department may adopt regulations to implement this division in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The initial adoption of any emergency regulations following the date on which this revised division takes effect shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. Emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this division shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13. No Wrong Door System [9800. - 9805.]

9800.

(a) The master plan for aging established pursuant to Executive Order N-14-19 shall consider the efficacy of utilizing a No Wrong Door System.

(b) The purpose of the No Wrong Door System shall be to assist older adults, people with
 disabilities, and caregivers obtain accurate information and timely referrals to appropriate community services and supports.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   (AB 1287)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

9805.

(a) The master plan for aging established pursuant to Executive Order N-14-19 shall consider the efficacy of utilizing a universal tool and process to streamline access to services through a coordinated assessment process. In
 considering the tool and process, the Master Plan for Aging Stakeholder Advisory Committee shall seek input from stakeholders, including, but not limited to, consumers, providers, and advocates.

(b) The assessment tool and process should be capable of assessing individual need and
 determining initial eligibility for programs and services available in the long-term services and supports delivery network.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   (AB 1287)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 14. Master Plan for Aging in California [9850. - 9850.]

9850.

(a) The Secretary of the California Health and Human Services Agency, in coordination with the Director of the California Department of Aging, shall lead the development and implementation of the master plan for aging established pursuant to Executive Order No. N-14-19.

(b) The Master Plan for Aging Stakeholder Advisory Committee established pursuant to Executive Order No. N-14-19 shall include representation from older Californians, adults with disabilities, local government, health care providers, health plans, employers, community-based
 organizations, foundations, academic researchers, and organized labor.

(c) The secretary and the director shall, with the assistance of the Cabinet-level Workgroup for Aging established pursuant to Executive Order No. N-14-19, work with the following state agencies, as needed, to identify policies, efficiencies, and strategies necessary to implement the master plan:

(1) Business, Consumer Services, and Housing Agency.

(2) Government Operations Agency.

(3) California Health and Human Services Agency.

(4) Labor and Workforce Development Agency.

(5) Transportation Agency.

(d) The workgroup shall solicit input from stakeholders and gather information on the impact of California’s aging population to assist with the implementation process of the master plan.

(e) The workgroup shall ensure the master plan is centered on all of the following core values:

(1) Equity. The master plan shall seek to enable older adults and people with disabilities to access long-term services and supports (LTSS) in accordance with individual needs and preferences, to the extent feasible, regardless of individual health or functional status, income, race, religion, or other socioeconomic factors.

(2) Person-centered. The master plan shall seek to enable older
 adults and people with disabilities to remain in their own homes and communities as long as possible or desired while receiving services and supports that are in line with their individual needs and preferences.

(3) Efficiency. The master plan for aging shall seek to reduce unnecessary costs and reduce duplication through streamlined service delivery.

(4) System rebalancing. The master plan shall prioritize the delivery of home- and community-based services in a home setting as alternatives to institutionalization, in accordance with individual needs, desires, and preferences.

(5) Coordination and integration. The master plan shall seek to streamline service delivery through coordinated and integrated systems of care.

(6) Access. The master plan shall
 ensure access to health care and LTSS in all communities across the state, including rural, suburban, and urban settings.

(f) (1) (A) The California Department of Aging shall submit a report to the Governor and the Legislature by October 1, 2020, identifying ways to improve the organization and structure of the California Department of Aging in order to effectively implement and administer the master plan. The report shall include, but not be limited to, identification of statutory and regulatory changes that are needed to implement the master plan.

(B) The California Department of Aging shall submit updates to the Governor and the Legislature annually beginning October 1, 2021, through October 1, 2030, inclusive. The updates shall include, but are not limited to, the status of the processes described in paragraph (1) and updates on data
 metrics, best practices, and model policies.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(g) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2026, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 116.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.\n   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 117 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

9850.

(a) The Secretary of the California Health and Human Services Agency, in coordination with the Director of the California Department of Aging, shall lead the development and implementation of the master plan for aging established pursuant to Executive Order No. N-14-19.

(b) The Master Plan for Aging Stakeholder Advisory Committee established pursuant to Executive Order No. N-14-19 shall include representation from older Californians, adults with disabilities, local government, health care providers, health plans, employers, community-based organizations, foundations, academic researchers, and organized labor.

(c) The secretary and the director shall, with the assistance of the
 Cabinet-level Workgroup for Aging established pursuant to Executive Order No. N-14-19, work with the following state agencies, as needed, to identify policies, efficiencies, and strategies necessary to implement the master plan:

(1) California Housing and Homelessness Agency.

(2) Government Operations Agency.

(3) California Health and Human Services Agency.

(4) Labor and Workforce Development Agency.

(5) Transportation Agency.

(6) Business and Consumer Services Agency.

(d) The workgroup shall solicit input from stakeholders and gather information on the impact
 of California’s aging population to assist with the implementation process of the master plan.

(e) The workgroup shall ensure the master plan is centered on all of the following core values:

(1) Equity. The master plan shall seek to enable older adults and people with disabilities to access long-term services and supports (LTSS) in accordance with individual needs and preferences, to the extent feasible, regardless of individual health or functional status, income, race, religion, or other socioeconomic factors.

(2) Person-centered. The master plan shall seek to enable older adults and people with disabilities to remain in their own homes and communities as long as possible or desired while receiving services and supports that are in line with their individual needs and preferences.

(3) Efficiency. The master plan for aging shall seek to reduce unnecessary costs and reduce duplication through streamlined service delivery.

(4) System rebalancing. The master plan shall prioritize the delivery of home- and community-based services in a home setting as alternatives to institutionalization, in accordance with individual needs, desires, and preferences.

(5) Coordination and integration. The master plan shall seek to streamline service delivery through coordinated and integrated systems of care.

(6) Access. The master plan shall ensure access to health care and LTSS in all communities across the state, including rural, suburban, and urban settings.

(f) (1) (A) The California Department of Aging shall submit a report to the Governor and the Legislature by October 1, 2020, identifying ways to improve the organization and structure of the California Department of Aging in order to effectively implement and administer the master plan. The report shall include, but not be limited to, identification of statutory and regulatory changes that are needed to implement the master plan.

(B) The California Department of Aging shall submit updates to the Governor and the Legislature annually beginning October 1, 2021, through October 1, 2030, inclusive. The updates shall include, but are not limited to, the status of the processes described in paragraph (1) and updates on data metrics, best practices, and model policies.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance
 with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 116) and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 117.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 15. Disaster Planning and Response [9860. - 9861.]

9860.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Emergency shelter” means a facility established to provide temporary refuge and essential services to individuals displaced by emergencies or disasters.

(b) “State Emergency Plan” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 8560 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 445, Sec. 1.   (AB 1069)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

9861.

As part of disaster planning and response, a representative of the county welfare director, in coordination with the lead local agency designated with sheltering support duties under the State Emergency Plan Emergency Support Functions, shall initiate a memorandum of understanding with an area agency on aging (AAA), an independent living center (ILC), or an Aging and Disability Resource Connection (ADRC) program to allow access by the AAA, the ILC, or the ADRC program to an emergency shelter established for evacuation purposes during an active event, in order to ensure that older adults and persons with disabilities receive continuous services and necessary support.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 445, Sec. 1.   (AB 1069)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 9. PUBLIC SOCIAL SERVICES [10000. - 18999.98.]



PART 1. DEFINITIONS AND GENERAL PROVISIONS [10000. - 10077.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [10000. - 10010.]

10000.

The purpose of this division is to provide for protection, care, and assistance to the people of the state in need thereof, and to promote the welfare and happiness of all of the people of the state by providing appropriate aid and services to all of its needy and distressed. It is the legislative intent that aid shall be administered and services provided promptly and humanely, with due regard for the preservation of family life, and without discrimination on account of ancestry, marital status, political affiliation, or any characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code. That aid shall be so administered and services so provided, to the extent not in conflict with federal law, as to encourage self-respect, self-reliance, and the desire to be a good citizen, useful to society.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 568, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

10001.

The purposes of the public social services for which state grants-in-aid are made to counties are:

(a) To provide on behalf of the general public, and within the limits of public resources, reasonable support and maintenance for needy and dependent families and persons.

(b) To provide timely and appropriate services to assist individuals develop or use whatever capacity they can maintain or achieve for self-care or self-support.

(c) To provide protective services to handicapped or deprived persons subject to social or legal disability, and to children and others subject to exploitation jeopardizing their present or future health, opportunity for normal development, or capacity for independence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

10002.

When an applicant for or recipient of public social services is incapable of managing his own resources and planning or carrying out arrangements for his own care and maintenance, and the applicant or recipient cannot secure the services of a private attorney, if authorized by the board of supervisors, the county counsel at the request of the county department, or the district attorney, if a county counsel does not exist, may initiate and carry out proceedings for the appointment of a public or private guardian or public or private conservator, or for changing the form of legal protection when this is indicated. Costs incurred in such proceedings for the protection of applicants or recipients, when not available from the person’s own resources, shall be a proper welfare administrative or service cost, except where a relative engages a private attorney to accomplish this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 415, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10003.

(a) It shall be the responsibility of a recipient of aid pursuant to this division changing residence from one county to another to promptly notify either the county from which he or she moves or the county to which he or she moves of the change of residence. Recipients of CalWORKs, CalFresh, or Medi-Cal shall have the option to report a change of residence in person, in writing, telephonically, or, if the technology is available, electronically online and shall be
 advised of these options at the time of application and redetermination or recertification. Within seven business days of notice of a new residence, the notified county shall initiate an intercounty transfer for all benefits under this division that the recipient is receiving, and benefits shall be transferred no later than the first day of the next available benefit month following 30 days after a county was notified pursuant to this section.

(b) To the greatest extent possible, the intercounty transfer process shall be simple and client friendly and minimize workload for county eligibility operations. The process shall ensure the applicant or recipient does not need to provide copies of documents that were previously provided to the prior county of residence, and there is no interruption in benefits.

(c) Case file documents shall be electronically shared between the prior county of residence and the new county of residence, to the extent possible, as specified by the relevant state departments.

(d) Notwithstanding
 Section 11052.5, the new county of residence shall not interview recipients moving to that county from another county to determine continued eligibility for CalFresh or CalWORKs until the next scheduled recertification pursuant to Section 18910.1 or redetermination pursuant to Section 11265. This section shall not preclude the new county of residence from interviewing CalWORKs recipients regarding welfare-to-work program participation, which is not a requirement for an intercounty transfer of CalWORKs eligibility.

(e) For beneficiaries required to receive services through a Medi-Cal managed care health plan, the following shall apply: 

(1) If the beneficiary moves to another county and
 is still enrolled in a managed care health plan in the county from which he or she moved, the beneficiary shall have continued access to emergency services and any other coverage the managed care health plan authorizes out-of-network until the time that the intercounty transfer process pursuant to subdivision (a) is complete and the beneficiary is disenrolled from the managed care health plan.

(2) If the beneficiary moves to another county and is still enrolled in a managed care health plan in the county from which he or she moved and needs
 nonemergent care that same month in the new county, the Medi-Cal Managed Care Ombudsman shall, upon request by the beneficiary or either county, disenroll the beneficiary as an expedited disenrollment from his or her managed care health plan. County-initiated disenrollment using an online form shall be processed no later than three business days after the request is made. Beneficiary-initiated disenrollment by telephone shall be effective no later than two business days after the request is made when the request is made before 5 p.m. Any beneficiary-initiated
 disenrollment request by phone made after 5 p.m. shall be processed the following business day and be effective no later than two business days after the request is processed.

(3) A beneficiary who is disenrolled from the managed care health plan in the county from which he or she moved pursuant to paragraph
 (2) shall be entitled to the full scope of benefits for which he or she is entitled to in the new county through the fee-for-service delivery system until he or she is enrolled in a managed care health plan in the new county.

(4) If the beneficiary moves to a county that provides Medi-Cal services through a county organized health system, the beneficiary shall be
 enrolled in that county organized health system plan on the first day of the following month once the new county of residence is reflected in the Medi-Cal Eligibility Data System. If a beneficiary moves to a county without a county organized health system, the usual health plan choice process shall apply.

(f) Failure to report a move to a different county within the state in itself shall not constitute a basis for an overpayment.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title
 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services and the State Department of Social Services, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time regulations are adopted. The State Department of Health Care Services and the State Department of Social Services shall adopt regulations by July 1, 2021, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) Beginning June 1, 2017, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services and the State Department of Social Services shall provide a status report on the adoption of the regulations to the Legislature on a semiannual basis, in compliance with Section 9795 of the
 Government Code, until regulations have been adopted.

(h) This section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent, that federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(i) This section shall become operative on June 1, 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 801, Sec. 1.   (SB 1339)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative June 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10006.

(a) A county human services agency shall designate at least one employee as a staff liaison, as provided in this section. The staff liaison shall serve as a point of contact for academic counselors and other relevant professional staff at a campus of an institution of public higher education located within the county and provide information on programs and services offered by the agency that may be available to students attending a campus of an institution of public higher education within the county. This requirement is not intended to supersede or otherwise alter existing relationships between counties and campuses of an institution of public higher education, including, but not limited to, coordination related to CalWORKs welfare-to-work
 participants who are attending a campus of an institution of public higher education.

(b) A county human services agency subject to this section, with input from the public institutions of higher education located within the county, including basic needs directors, basic needs coordinators, or designated staff from each campus of a public institution of higher education, shall develop protocols for engagement between the agency and a campus of an institution of public higher education located within the county. The agency and the public institutions of higher education located within the county are encouraged to consult stakeholders while developing the protocol, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) A representative from each campus of an institution of public higher
 education within the county. The representative shall be a staff member tasked with addressing students’ basic needs on the campus.

(2) A counselor or other relevant professional staff from each campus of an institution of public higher education within the county.

(3) Relevant organizations representing the interests of students, faculty, and staff from each campus of an institution of public higher education within the county.

(c) Counties are encouraged to provide information to the campuses of an institution of public higher education located within their borders regarding the location and hours of county human services agency public offices, as well as information regarding online and telephone access to
 program applications. Each campus of an institution of public higher education is encouraged to disseminate information regarding applying for human services programs and benefits to the campus administrator associated with student services or their designee.

(d) The State Department of Social Services shall do all of the following:

(1) In consultation with staff liaisons and basic needs directors, basic needs coordinators, or other designated professional staff from institutions of public higher education within the county, develop a training to be available for basic needs directors, staff of a campus basic needs center, other designated professional staff from each campus of an institution of higher education, and eligibility workers. The training shall focus on public social
 services topics, including all of the following:

(A) Local Programs that Increase Employability (LPIE) familiarity.

(B) State Department of Health Care Services and State Department of Social Services policy updates, including review of the CalFresh Student Eligibility Handbook. 

(C) Other college student related training, including information related to financial aid, scholarships, dependent status, eligibility criteria for public social services programs, and other information related to the needs specific to college students.

(2) Convene a workgroup that meets
 quarterly to share best practices, address challenges, and identify statewide issues, comprised of all of the following:

(A) At least 12 county staff liaisons, comprised of at least 2 county staff liaisons from each of the six regions of the California Statewide Automated Welfare System (CalSAWS) consortium.

(B) At least four college campus basic needs directors, basic needs coordinators, or other designated campus staff from multiple regions and campuses.

(C) At least one staff member from each higher education segment, including, but not limited to:

(i) The office of the Chancellor of the California State University.

(ii) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(iii) The office of the President of the University of California if a representative is provided. The office of the President of the University of California is requested to provide a representative for purposes of this workgroup.

(D) The Center for Healthy Communities at California State
 University, Chico.

(E) Relevant stakeholders as needed to share best practices, updates, challenges, or other topics related to programs and services offered by the department that may be available to students attending the campus of an institution of public higher education.

(3) (A) On or before May 1, 2027, and every three years thereafter, in collaboration with stakeholders identified pursuant to this section, submit a report to the Legislature with findings and recommendations relating to enrollment success trends, best practices, and services offered by the department
 that may be available to students attending a campus of an institution of public higher education.

(B) A report to be submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) Any disclosure or sharing of personal information under this section shall be made in compliance with applicable state and federal confidentiality laws.

(f) For purposes of this section, “basic needs coordinator” means a coordinator, as defined in Section 66023.4 or 66023.5 of the Education Code. 

(g) For purposes of this section, “public higher education” has the same meaning as in Section 66010 of the Education Code.

(h) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services may implement this section by all-county letters or similar instructions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 607, Sec. 2.   (AB 79)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10010.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law and to the extent permitted by federal law, a Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event payment received by a taxpayer shall not be considered income or resources for purposes of determining eligibility for benefits, or the amount of benefits, under a means-tested program, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Childcare and development programs, as defined in Section 10213.5.

(2) The California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids (CalWORKs) program, as described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3.

(3) The Kinship Guardianship Assistance Payment (Kin-GAP) Program, as described in Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) of Chapter 2 of Part 3.

(4) The State Supplementary Program (SSP) for Aged, Blind and Disabled, as described in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3.

(5) The Medi-Cal program, as described in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3.

(6) The Adoption Assistance Program (AAP), as described in Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115) of Part 4.

(7) General assistance programs, as described in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 5.

(8) The CalFresh program, as described in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6.

(9) The California Food Assistance Program (CFAP), as described in Chapter 10.1 (commencing with Section 18930) of Part 6.

(10) The Cash Assistance Program for Aged, Blind, and Disabled Legal Immigrants (CAPI), as described in Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 18937) of Part 6. 

(b) Notwithstanding any other law and to the extent permitted by federal law, a Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event payment received by a taxpayer shall not be considered income or resources for purposes of determining eligibility for guaranteed income payments or the amount of those guaranteed
 income payments.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event payment” has the same meaning as defined in Sections 17157.5 and 24309.9 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) “Guaranteed income payments” means unconditional, recurring, regular cash payments, whether publicly or privately funded, that are intended to support the basic needs of eligible recipients, including, but not limited to, payments provided through pilot programs or projects receiving funding from the California Guaranteed Income Pilot Program, as described in Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 18997) of Part 6, or payments provided through locally funded programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 17, Sec. 26.   (SB 132)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Health Care Insurance [10020. - 10025.]

10020.

(a) No person having private health care coverage shall be entitled to receive the same health care items or services furnished or paid for by a publicly funded health care program.

(b) As used in this chapter:

(1) “Publicly funded health care program” shall mean care or services rendered by a local government or any facility thereof, or health care services for which payment is made under the California Medical Assistance Program established by Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of this division by the State Department of Health Services or by its fiscal intermediary, or by a carrier or other organization with which the State Department of Health Services has contracted to furnish those services or to pay providers who furnish those services.

(2) As used in this chapter, “private health care coverage” means any health insurer, self-insured plan, group health plan, as defined in Section 607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, service benefit plan, managed care organization, including health care service plans as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 1345 of the Health and Safety Code, licensed pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, pharmacy benefit manager, or other party that is, by statute, contract, or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a health care item or service.

 (c) If a person receives health care furnished or paid for by a publicly funded health care program, the carrier of the person’s private health care coverage shall reimburse the publicly funded health care program the cost incurred in rendering that care to the extent of the benefits provided under the terms of the policy for the items provided or the services rendered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 188, Sec. 32.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

10022.

(a) Each publicly funded health care program, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 10020, that furnishes or pays for health care items or services under this division to a person having private health care coverage shall be entitled to be subrogated to the rights that person has against the carrier of the coverage to the extent of the health care items provided or services rendered.
